Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.330.210

Notice to ESD superintendent of change of chairman or superintendent.

Every school district superintendent in districts of the second class shall within ten days after any change in the office of chair or superintendent, notify the educational service district superintendent of such change.

[ 1990 c 33 s 350; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 11. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 119; 1975 c 43 s 15; 1971 c 48 s 35; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.070; prior: 1909 c 97 p 304 s 1; RRS s 4841; prior: 1903 c 104 s 19. Formerly RCW 28A.60.070, 28.63.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.